test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-putes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - putes: # 2A
    putes+N+Sg+Nom: putes
    putes+N+Sg+Gen: puttás
    putes+N+Sg+Acc: puttás
    putes+N+Sg+Ill: puttásân
    putes+N+Sg+Loc: puttásist
    putes+N+Sg+Com: puttásáin
    putes+N+Sg+Abe: puttásttáá
    putes+N+Ess:    putesin                 #putásin
    putes+N+Par:    putesid                 #putásid
    putes+N+Pl+Nom: puttáseh
    putes+N+Pl+Gen: puttásij
    putes+N+Pl+Acc: puttásijd
    putes+N+Pl+Ill: puttásáid
    putes+N+Pl+Loc: puttásijn
    putes+N+Pl+Com: puttásijguin
    putes+N+Pl+Abe: puttásijttáá
   
